Georgia, session 2025_26, HB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
20 PART I
21 SECTION 1-1.
22 Chapter 3 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to parks, historic
23 areas, memorials, and recreation, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
24 "ARTICLE 13
25 12-3-710.
26 This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Vince Dooley Battlefield Trust Fund
27 Act.'
28 12-3-711.
29 As used in this article, the term:
30 (1) 'Conservation easement' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
31 Section 44-10-2.
32 (2) 'Department' means the Department of Natural Resources.
33 (3) 'Fund' means the Vince Dooley Battlefield Trust Fund.
34 (4) 'Matching contributions' means cash and the value of any contribution due to a
35 bargain sale or the donation of land or interest therein made by the landowner as part of
36 a project proposal.
37 (5) 'Organization' means a not for profit charitable corporation or trust authorized to do
38 business in this state which is involved in the acquisition and management of interests in
39 land for historic preservation purposes and which has tax exempt status as a public
40 charity under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
- 2 -

25 LC 59 0143S
41 (6) 'Program' means the Vince Dooley Battlefield Trust Fund Program.
42 (7) 'Project proposal' means any application seeking money from the Vince Dooley
43 Battlefield Trust Fund Program.
44 (8) 'State agency' means the State of Georgia or any department, division, board, bureau,
45 commission, or other agency of the executive branch of state government which has a
46 mission to preserve, protect, or conserve natural, historical, or cultural resources.
47 12-3-712.
48 (a)(1) The state treasurer shall establish a separate trust fund in the state treasury that
49 shall be known as the Vince Dooley Battlefield Trust Fund, consisting of annual
50 appropriations by the General Assembly to the fund, public or private grants, gifts,
51 donations, or contributions dedicated to the fund for battlefield preservation, and moneys
52 from any other source, including local, state, or federal program funds dedicated to the
53 fund for battlefield preservation.
54 (2) The state treasurer shall invest the money held in the fund in the same manner in
55 which state funds are invested as authorized by the State Depository Board pursuant to
56 Article 3 of Chapter 17 of Title 50. Interest earned by the money held in the fund shall
57 be accounted for separately and shall be credited to the fund to be disbursed as other
58 moneys in the fund.
59 (b) Moneys held in the fund shall be expended by the department solely as provided in this
60 article.
61 (c) The department shall prepare an accounting of the funds expended pursuant to this
62 article during the most recently completed fiscal year to be provided to the Office of
63 Planning and Budget, the House Budget and Research Office, and the Senate Budget and
64 Evaluation Office by January 1 of each year.
- 3 -

25 LC 59 0143S
65 12-3-713.
66 (a) There is established the Vince Dooley Battlefield Trust Fund Program to be
67 administered by the department. In administering the program, the department shall, each
68 fiscal year, make available money from the Vince Dooley Battlefield Trust Fund for
69 matching grants to any organization or state agency having a project proposal which has
70 been reviewed and approved by the department.
71 (b) The department shall make available money from the fund solely for the purpose of
72 awarding grants to organizations or state agencies for the fee simple purchase of, or
73 purchase of permanent protective interests in, any Georgia battlefield listed in the following
74 reports:
75 (1) The Report on the Nation's Civil War Battlefields by the Civil War Sites Advisory
76 Commission (Civil War Sites Advisory Commission/National Parks Service, 1993, as
77 amended); or
78 (2) The Report to Congress on the Historic Preservation of Revolutionary War and War
79 of 1812 Sites in the United States by the American Battlefield Protection Program of the
80 National Park Service (United States Department of the Interior/National Park Service,
81 2007, as amended).
82 (c) Organizations seeking grant funding shall be required to provide at least $1.00 in
83 matching contributions for each $1.00 received from the fund for the project proposal.
84 Unless the applicant is a state agency, no state funds shall be included in determining the
85 amount of such matching contributions.
86 (d) Eligible costs for which money from the fund may be allocated include acquisition of
87 land and any improvements thereon or permanent protective interests, such as perpetual
88 conservation easements, and costs associated with such acquisitions, including the cost of
89 any appraisals, environmental reports, surveys, title searches and title insurance, and other
90 closing costs.
- 4 -

25 LC 59 0143S
91 (e) Grants from the fund shall not exceed 50 percent of the appraised value of the land or
92 permanent protective interest therein.
93 (f) Grants from the fund may be awarded for prospective purchases or for acquisitions on
94 which the applicant has closed. In the latter case, the applicant shall demonstrate that:
95 (1) The closing occurred no more than 12 months prior to the date of application for the
96 grant; and
97 (2) An identifiable threat to the resource or compelling need for preservation existed at
98 the time of the purchase.
99 (g) Money from the fund, in an amount not to exceed 5 percent of total moneys held by
100 the fund, shall be made available to the department for costs incurred in administering the
101 program each fiscal year.
102 12-3-714.
103 The department shall establish guidelines for applications, evaluations, and awards from
104 the fund in consultation with relevant battlefield preservation interests. In awarding grants,
105 the department shall give primary consideration to the following factors:
106 (1) Significance of the battlefield that is the subject of the project proposal;
107 (2) Degree to which the property or interest therein to be acquired falls within the core
108 and study areas of the battlefield, as described in the relevant report of the American
109 Battlefield Protection Program;
110 (3) Proximity of the property to other protected lands;
111 (4) Threats to the integrity of features associated with the relevant battle;
112 (5) The financial capacity of the applicant to complete the project; and
113 (6) The administrative capacity of the applicant to maintain and manage the property in
114 a manner that is consistent with public interests, such as recreation, research, heritage
115 tourism promotion, and orderly community development.
- 5 -

25 LC 59 0143S
116 12-3-715.
117 (a) Any organization making an acquisition of property or interest therein pursuant to this
118 article shall grant to the department or other holder a perpetual conservation easement
119 placing restrictions on the use or development of the property. In cases where the easement
120 is granted to a holder other than the department, all terms and conditions of the easement
121 shall accomplish the perpetual preservation of the property. Such other holder shall
122 demonstrate to the department that it has the capacity and expertise to manage and enforce
123 the terms of the easement.
124 (b) Nothing in this Code section shall preclude the subsequent transfer or assignment by
125 a state agency or other holder of any property interest acquired pursuant to this article to
126 the State of Georgia or to the United States of America to be incorporated into a national
127 park, national forest, national wildlife refuge, or other national conservation area in
128 accordance with 54 U.S.C. Section 10010, 16 U.S.C. Section 551, the Fish and Wildlife
129 Act of 1956 (16 U.S.C. Section 742a et seq.), or 16 U.S.C. Section 1131, as amended and
130 applicable. The department shall facilitate transfers and assignments of any such interests."
131 PART II
132 SECTION 2-1.
133 Chapter 3 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state flag, seal,
134 and other symbols, is amended by revising subsection (b) of Code Section 50-3-1, relating
135 to description of state flag, militia to carry flag, monument offenses, penalties, and cause of
136 action and adding new subsections to read as follows:
137 "(b)(1) As used in this subsection, the term:
138 (A) 'Agency' means any state or local government entity, including any department,
139 agency, bureau, authority, board, educational institution, commission, or
140 instrumentality or subdivision thereof, and specifically including a local board of
- 6 -

25 LC 59 0143S
141 education, the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, and any
142 institution of the University System of Georgia.
143 (B) 'Monument' means a monument, plaque, statue, marker, flag, banner, structure
144 name, display, or memorial constructed and located with the intent of being
145 permanently displayed and perpetually maintained that is:
146 (i) Dedicated to a historical entity or historically significant military, religious, civil,
147 civil rights, political, social, or cultural events or series of events; or
148 (ii) Dedicated to, honors, or recounts the military service of any past or present
149 military personnel of this state; the United States of America or the several states
150 thereof; or the Confederate States of America or the several states thereof.
151 (C) 'Officer' means an officer, official, body, employee, contractor, representative, or
152 agent of any agency, whether appointed or elected.
153 (2) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, officer, agency, or other entity
154 to mutilate, deface, defile, damage, destroy, lose, or abuse contemptuously any publicly
155 or privately owned monument located, erected, constructed, created, or maintained on
156 real property owned by an agency or the State of Georgia. No person, firm, corporation,
157 officer, or agency, or other entity shall remove or conceal from display any such
158 monument for the purpose of preventing the visible display of the same. A violation of
159 this paragraph shall constitute person that violates this Code section shall be guilty of a
160 misdemeanor.
161 (3) No publicly or privately owned monument erected, constructed, created, or
162 maintained on the public property of this state or its agencies, departments, authorities,
163 or instrumentalities or on real property owned by an agency or the State of Georgia shall
164 be relocated, removed, concealed, obscured, or altered in any fashion by any officer or
165 agency; provided, however, that appropriate measures for the preservation, protection,
166 and interpretation and protection in place of such monument or memorial shall not be
167 prohibited.
- 7 -

25 LC 59 0143S
168 (4) Any person, firm, corporation, officer, agency, or other entity that damages, destroys,
169 or loses a monument or that takes or removes a monument without replacing it violates
170 this Code section shall be liable for treble the amount of the full cost of repair or
171 replacement of such monument and may be subject to exemplary damages unless such
172 person or entity was authorized to take such action by the public entity owning such
173 monument. In addition to treble the cost of repair or replacement and possible exemplary
174 damages, the person, firm, corporation, officer, agency, or other entity shall also be liable
175 for the attorney's fees and court costs expended by the public entity owner of the
176 monument or person, group, or legal entity claimant under this Code section in any action
177 or proceeding required to establish liability and collect amounts owed. Should a public
178 entity owner of the monument or person, group, or other legal entity prevail in any action
179 claimant under this Code section prevail in any action, such prevailing party claimant
180 shall use the moneys collected from the party mutilating, defacing, defiling, damaging,
181 destroying, losing, abusing, or relocating such monument to timely pay for the cost of or
182 repair or placement restoration of the monument to its former condition prior to being
183 mutilated, defaced, defiled, damaged, destroyed, lost, abused, or relocated upon moneys
184 being collected from the party damaging, destroying, or losing such monument.
185 (5) A public entity owning a monument or any Any interested person, group, or legal
186 entity, without regard to ownership of the monument or a specialized and personalized
187 injury, shall have standing and a right to bring a cause of action for any conduct
188 prohibited by this Code section for damages as permitted by this Code section. Such
189 claimant may bring an action individually or in a representative capacity against the
190 person, firm, corporation, officer, agency, or other entity that violates this Code section
191 to seek injunctive relief and to recover attorney's fees, expenses of litigation, and general
192 and exemplary damages sustained as a result of such unlawful actions. Such action shall
193 be brought in the superior court of the county in which the monument was located.
- 8 -

25 LC 59 0143S
194 (6) Except as provided in this paragraph subsection, it shall be unlawful for any person,
195 firm, corporation, officer, agency, or other entity acting without authority to mutilate,
196 deface, defile, damage, destroy, alter, abuse contemptuously, relocate, remove, conceal,
197 or obscure any privately owned monument located on privately owned property. Any
198 person or entity that suffers injury or damages as a result of a violation of this paragraph
199 may bring an action individually or in a representative capacity against the person or
200 persons, firm, corporation, officer, agency, or other entity committing such violations to
201 seek to recover general and exemplary damages sustained as a result of such person's or
202 persons' unlawful actions of any such defendant. Any person, firm, corporation, officer,
203 agency, or other entity that mutilates, defaces, defiles, damages, destroys, alters, abuses
204 contemptuously, relocates, removes, conceals, or obscures a monument or that takes or
205 removes a privately owned monument without the authority to do so shall be liable for
206 treble the amount of the full cost of repair or replacement of such monument and may be
207 subject to exemplary damages. In addition to treble the cost of repair or replacement and
208 possible exemplary damages, such person, firm, corporation, officer, agency, or other
209 entity shall also be liable for the attorney's fees and court costs expended by the claimant
210 under this Code section in any action or proceeding required to establish liability and
211 collect amounts owed. This paragraph shall not apply to an a private owner of real
212 property storing regarding such owner's privately owned monuments.
213 (7) Nothing Other than the provisions of paragraph (11) of this subsection, nothing in
214 this Code section shall prevent an agency from relocating a monument when relocation
215 is necessary for the construction, expansion, or alteration of edifices, buildings, roads,
216 streets, highways, or other transportation construction projects. Any monument relocated
217 for such purposes shall be relocated to a site of similar prominence, honor, visibility, and
218 access within the same county or municipality in which the monument was originally
219 located. A monument shall not be relocated to a museum, cemetery, or mausoleum
220 unless it was originally placed at such location.
- 9 -

25 LC 59 0143S
221 (8) In all cases when there has been an alleged violation of this Code section, the
222 Attorney General or the district attorney of the county in which the monument was
223 located may represent the interests of the monument owner, the interests of others with
224 interest in the monument, and the interests of the state as parens patriae in all legal
225 matters pertaining to the enforcement of this Code section. The Attorney General or the
226 district attorney may bring actions, and, insofar as an action of this nature may be deemed
227 an action against the state and its agencies, the state expressly gives its consent thereto.
228 (9) Conduct prohibited by this Code section shall be enjoined by the appropriate superior
229 court upon proper application.
230 (10) No claimant shall be required to show a particularized or personal concrete injury
231 to make a claim for damages.
232 (11) In the event that an agency desires to remove a monument from public display or
233 relocate such monument, the agency shall give 90 days' public notice in the legal organ
234 of the county in which such monument is located of such intent and, if the agency desires
235 to remove the monument from public display, shall solicit in such public notice any third
236 party that would be interested in receiving such monument for public display. No action
237 with regard to removing or relocating such monument shall be taken by the agency until
238 the expiration of the 90 day period, provided that such period shall be tolled during the
239 pendency of any litigation requesting an injunction to prevent such agency from
240 removing such monument from public display or relocating such monument or requesting
241 other sanctions under this Code section until a decision on the merits of such litigation
242 is final. Except as may be otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, at the
243 conclusion of the 90 day period, the agency shall either safely store and maintain such
244 monument or, if a third party so requests, transfer the monument to such third party,
245 provided that such third party agrees to publicly display the monument at either a location
246 owned by such third party or a location owned by a public agency that such third party
247 has permission to use for such display. In the event that multiple third parties are
- 10 -

25 LC 59 0143S
248 interested in receiving such monument for public display, preference shall be given to the
249 third party that is willing to publicly display such monument in a location within the
250 jurisdiction where the monument is located. The agency shall be responsible for all costs
251 of moving and placing the monument in a new location."
252 "(d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to interfere with the rights of any
253 private monument owner. For the purposes of protection pursuant to this Code section, any
254 monument found to be privately owned shall be treated as publicly owned. No transfer of
255 title of such a monument is conveyed by this Code section.
256 (e) The Department of Community Affairs shall establish a registry of all monuments in
257 this state located on public property. Such registry shall contain, at a minimum, a
258 description of each monument, the location of such monument, and a statement as to
259 whether the monument itself is privately or publicly owned and the name of the owner.
260 Such registry shall include monuments that are in storage as well as monuments on public
261 display. No later than December 31, 2025, each agency shall send to the Department of
262 Community Affairs a comprehensive list of all monuments within the jurisdiction of such
263 agency containing the information set forth in this Code section. Thereafter, any time a
264 monument is relocated to a place that is different from the location on the monument
265 registry maintained by the Department of Community Affairs the agency within whose
266 jurisdiction such monument is located shall immediately notify the Department of
267 Community Affairs of the new location of the monument."
268 PART III
269 SECTION 3-1.
270 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 11 -